fi: Hybridivoimalaitteen kokoonpano: Rinnakkaishybridi; Tehonjakohybridi (sarja-rinnakkaishybridi); Sarjahybridi; Tiehybridi (erilliset etu-/taka-akselit); Muu
ro-RO: Configurația sistemului de propulsie hibrid: Hibrid paralel; Distribuție a puterii (serie-paralel); Hibrid în serie; Prin șosea (punți față/spate separate); Altele
pt-BR: Configuração do trem de força híbrido: Híbrido paralelo; Divisão de potência (série-paralelo); Híbrido em série; Through-the-road (eixos dianteiro/traseiro separados); Outro
fr: Configuration de la chaîne cinématique hybride: Hybride parallèle; Hybride à dérivation de puissance (série-parallèle); Hybride série; Hybride TTR (essieux avant/arrière séparés); Autre
sv: Hybrid drivlinakonfiguration: Parallellhybrid; Effektdelning (serie-parallell); Seriehybrid; Through-the-road (separata fram-/bakaxlar); Övrigt
zh-TW: 混合動力傳動系統配置: 並聯式混合動力; 動力分流 (串並聯); 串聯式混合動力; 過路式混合動力 (分離式前後軸); 其他
tr: Hibrit güç aktarma sistemi yapılandırması: Paralel hibrit; Güç bölmeli (seri-paralel); Seri hibrit; Yol üzerinden (ayrı ön/arka akslar); Diğer
da: Konfiguration af hybrid drivlinje: Parallelhybrid; Effektdeling (serie-parallel); Seriehybrid; Through-the-road (separate for-/bagaksler); Andet
pt-PT: Configuração de transmissão híbrida: Híbrido paralelo; Repartição de potência (série-paralelo); Híbrido em série; Através da estrada (eixos dianteiro/traseiro separados); Outro
vi: Cấu hình hệ thống truyền động hybrid: Hybrid song song; Phân phối công suất (nối tiếp-song song); Hybrid nối tiếp; Dẫn động độc lập trục trước/sau (Through-the-road); Khác
nl: Hybride aandrijflijn configuratie: Parallelle hybride; Powersplit (serieel-parallel); Seriële hybride; Through-the-road (gescheiden voor-/achterassen); Overig
de: Konfiguration des Hybridantriebs: Parallelhybrid; Leistungsverzweigt (Seriell-Parallel); Serieller Hybrid; Through-the-Road-Hybrid (getrennte Vorder-/Hinterachse); Sonstiges
en: Hybrid drivetrain configuration: Parallel hybrid; Power-split (series-parallel); Series hybrid; Through-the-road (separate front/rear axles); Other
lt-LT: Hibridinės pavaros konfigūracija: Lygiagretusis hibridas; Galios paskirstymo (nuoseklusis ir lygiagretusis); Nuoseklusis hibridas; Per kelią (atskiros priekinė ir galinė ašys); Kita
th: การกำหนดค่าระบบขับเคลื่อนแบบไฮบริด: ไฮบริดแบบคู่ขนาน; แยกกำลัง (อนุกรม-คู่ขนาน); ไฮบริดแบบอนุกรม; ขับเคลื่อนผ่านล้อ (แยกเพลาหน้า/หลัง); อื่นๆ
it: Configurazione del sistema di propulsione ibrido: Ibrido parallelo; A divisione di potenza (serie/parallelo); Ibrido serie; Through-the-road (assi anteriori/posteriori separati); Altro
ru: Конфигурация гибридной трансмиссии: Параллельный гибрид; Разветвленный (последовательно-параллельный гибрид); Последовательный гибрид; Гибрид с раздельным приводом осей (через дорогу); Другое
zh-CN: 混合动力驱动配置: 并联式混合动力; 动力分流式 (混联式); 串联式混合动力; 道路耦合式 (独立前后轴); 其他
cs: Konfigurace hybridního pohonu: Paralelní hybrid; Kombinovaný (sériově-paralelní) hybrid; Sériový hybrid; Pohon přes vozovku (oddělená přední a zadní náprava); Ostatní
bg-BG: Конфигурация на хибридното задвижване: Паралелен хибрид; С разделяне на мощността (последователно-паралелен); Последователен хибрид; През пътя (отделни преден/заден мост); Друго
sl-SI: Konfiguracija hibridnega pogonskega sklopa: Vzporedni hibrid; Porazdelitev moči (serijsko-vzporedni); Serijski hibrid; Prenos prek ceste (ločena sprednja/zadnja os); Drugo
hu: Hibrid hajtáslánc-konfiguráció: Párhuzamos hibrid; Teljesítményelosztó (soros-párhuzamos); Soros hibrid; Különálló (külön első/hátsó tengely); Egyéb
nb: Hybrid drivverkskonfigurasjon: Parallellhybrid; Effektdeling (serie-parallell); Seriehybrid; Gjennom veien (separate for-/bakaksler); Annet
ja: ハイブリッド駆動系構成: パラレルハイブリッド; 動力分割式 (シリーズ・パラレル); シリーズハイブリッド; スルー・ザ・ロード (前後独立アクスル); その他
hr-HR: Konfiguracija hibridnog pogonskog sklopa: Paralelni hibrid; Razdvojena snaga (serijsko-paralelni); Serijski hibrid; Prijenos preko ceste (zasebne prednje/stražnje osovine); Ostalo
el: Διαμόρφωση υβριδικού συστήματος μετάδοσης κίνησης: Παράλληλο υβριδικό; Διαχωρισμού ισχύος (σειριακό-παράλληλο); Σειριακό υβριδικό; Διαμέσου του δρόμου (ξεχωριστοί μπροστινοί/πίσω άξονες); Άλλο
pl: Konfiguracja hybrydowego układu napędowego: Hybryda równoległa; Hybryda szeregowo-równoległa; Hybryda szeregowa; Z niezależnym napędem osi przedniej i tylnej; Inne
sk-SK: Konfigurácia hybridného pohonu: Paralelný hybrid; Delič výkonu (sériovo-paralelný); Sériový hybrid; Cez vozovku (oddelená predná/zadná náprava); Iné
es: Configuración de transmisión híbrida: Híbrido paralelo; División de potencia (serie-paralelo); Híbrido en serie; Through-the-road (ejes delantero y trasero separados); Otra
ko: 하이브리드 구동계 구성: 병렬 하이브리드; 동력 분기형(직병렬); 직렬 하이브리드; TTR(전후축 분리형); 기타